Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 9

Travel and Expenses

6-54-901. Reimbursement for expenses incident to holding office.

Notwithstanding any public or private act to the contrary, in all municipalities of the state, any mayor and any member of the local governing body, and any board or committee member elected or appointed by the mayor or local governing body, and any official or employee of the municipality whose salary is set by charter or general law, may be reimbursed from municipal funds for the actual expense that such municipal officer may incur as an incident to holding such office.

The municipal legislative body shall by ordinance determine whether or not to pay the expenses of the mayor or any member of the local governing body, and any board or committee member elected or appointed by the mayor or local governing body, and any official or employee of the municipality whose salary is set by charter or general law; and, if it is determined that the municipality will reimburse expenses, shall enact a written policy as to how expenses will be reimbursed and determine what expenses are reimbursable.

In such municipality it is the duty of the chief administrative officer or such chief administrative officer's designee to prescribe forms on which expenses will be reported, and it is further made such chief administrative officer's duty to examine such expense report to determine if all expenses so listed as reimbursable are legally reimbursable expenditures within the schedule as determined by the municipal legislative body, and, if such listed expenses are reimbursable, then to forward the expense report to the proper disbursing officer for payment.

Acts 1993, ch. 433, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Reimbursement of public utility board members, OAG 94-045, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 51 (4/4/94).

6-54-902. When expense allowances to be treated as compensation.

To the extent not adequately documented as provided in § 6-54-901, expense allowances shall be considered compensation for purposes of any salary limitations as may be provided by statute, charter or private act.

Acts 1993, ch. 433, § 2.

6-54-903. Policies and amendments to be filed with the comptroller.

All municipal travel and expense reimbursement policies, and any amendments thereto, shall be filed with the office of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller of the treasury's designee. Such policies and amendments are not subject to the approval of, but shall not be effective until filed with, the office of the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1993, ch. 433, § 3.

6-54-904. Municipal technical advisory service model policies.

The municipal technical advisory service (MTAS) shall disseminate, and amend from time to time as necessary, a model travel and expense policy to provide guidance for the various municipalities. Such policy and amendments thereto are subject to the approval of the comptroller of the treasury. Any municipality that adopts the policy promulgated by MTAS is not required to file such policy with the office of the comptroller of the treasury, but shall notify the comptroller in writing that the policy promulgated by MTAS was adopted and the date such action was taken.

Acts 1993, ch. 433, § 4; 2004, ch. 656, § 3.

6-54-905. Provision of vehicles — Policy.

Municipalities may provide vehicles for the use of the mayor, any member of the local governing body, any board or committee member elected or appointed by the mayor or local governing body, and any official or employee whose salary is set by charter or general law. Such vehicles shall be provided pursuant to a written policy adopted by the municipal legislative body. The written policy for vehicle use shall be separate from the travel and expense policy provided for in the previous sections of this part and shall contain no other subject matter.

Acts 1993, ch. 433, § 5.

6-54-906. Direct payments.

In addition to the authority to reimburse expenses provided in this part, municipalities may pay directly for travel expenses, including meals and lodging, and registration fees for conferences, conventions, seminars, and other education programs on behalf of the mayor, and any member of the local governing body, and any board or committee member elected or appointed by the mayor or local governing body, and any official or employee whose salary is set by charter or general law, provided payment is made directly to the provider and not to the official or employee.

Acts 1993, ch. 433, § 6.

6-54-907. Applicability.

This part does not apply to municipalities nor to metropolitan governments with a population greater than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the most recent federal decennial census. Those municipalities and metropolitan governments may elect to pay and/or reimburse expenses for their officials in accordance with travel and expense policies that may be adopted and amended from time to time by the appropriate bodies or officials.

Acts 1993, ch. 433, § 7.